Utah statutes.
77-28a-4.   Board of Pardons and Parole -- Authority to hold hearings.
The Board of Pardons and Parole is hereby authorized and directed to hold such
hearings as may be requested by any other party state pursuant to Article IV
(a) of the Interstate Corrections Compact.  The board is further authorized to
travel to any state which is a party to that Compact and to which an inmate is
sent for confinement, for the purpose of holding any hearing to which that
inmate is entitled by the laws of Utah.
